New York, session 2025-2026, A8067.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 2 of section 711 of the banking law, as 2 amended by section 1 of part L of chapter 58 of the laws of 2019, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 2. The licensing provisions of this article shall not apply to any 5 exempt organization that is a student loan servicer; provided that, 6 unless preempted by federal law, such exempt organization [notifies] 7 shall notify the superintendent that it is servicing student loans in 8 this state and complies with sections seven hundred seventeen, seven 9 hundred nineteen, seven hundred twenty-one, seven hundred twenty-three 10 and seven hundred twenty-five of this article and article nine of the 11 financial services law and any regulation applicable to student loan 12 servicers promulgated by the superintendent. 13 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11792-02-5